Hawaii statutes.
§172-7 Unsurveyed lands; listing by
comptroller. The comptroller shall prepare a list of all ahupuaas,
iliainas, and leles within the State (including those owned by the government),
on which there has been no legal description of survey determined by metes and
bounds, either by incorporation of same in land commission award, or patent in
confirmation of award, or patent grant, or government deed, or deed of the
commissioners of crown lands, or land court survey, or certificate of
boundaries, or by decree of a court of competent jurisdiction of the State. [L
1919, c 208, §1; am L 1923, c 155, §1; RL 1925, §564; RL 1935, §1690; RL 1945,
§4637; RL 1955, §100-7; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §172-7]

Note

The amendment made by
L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next